Maine, session 132, LD2148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§7, ¶K, as amended by PL 2013, c. 368, Pt. H, §1, is
further amended to read:
K. The total premium increase for active and retired state employee health insurance
is capped at the fiscal year 2010-11 funding level for the fiscal years ending June 30,
2012 and June 30, 2013. The total premium increase for the fiscal years ending June
30, 2014 and June 30, 2015 is limited to no more than 1.5 percentage points per year.
The total premium increase for fiscal years ending after June 30, 2015 and on or before
June 30, 2026 is limited to no more than any percentage increase in the Consumer Price
Index as defined in section 17001, subsection 9 plus 3%. The total premium increase
for fiscal years ending after June 30, 2026 is limited to no more than any percentage
increase in the Consumer Price Index as defined in section 17001, subsection 9 plus
10%. The total premium increase limit for fiscal years ending after June 30, 2026 does
not apply to the fully insured Medicare Advantage prescription drug plan.
Page 1 - 132LR2681(04)